nb: Gjennomtrekks-vektmateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Plast; Gummibelagt metall; Rustfritt stål; Tre; Annet
pt-PT: Material de peso de passagem: Alumínio; Latão; Plástico; Metal revestido a borracha; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
el: Υλικό βαριδίου pull-through: Αλουμίνιο; Ορείχαλκος; Πλαστικό; Μέταλλο με επικάλυψη καουτσούκ; Ανοξείδωτο ατσάλι; Ξύλο; Άλλο
it: Materiale di peso da tirare: Alluminio; Ottone; Plastica; Metallo rivestito in gomma; Acciaio inossidabile; Legno; Altro
nl: Doorhaalwisser gewichtsmateriaal: Aluminium; Messing; Plastic; Met rubber bekleed metaal; Roestvrij staal; Hout; Overig
de: Material des Durchzugsgewichts: Aluminium; Messing; Kunststoff; Gummibeschichtetes Metall; Edelstahl; Holz; Sonstige
fi: Läpivedettävän liinan painon materiaali: Alumiini; Messinki; Muovi; Kumipinnoitettu metalli; Ruostumaton teräs; Puu; Muu
es: Material de peso pasante: Aluminio; Latón; Plástico; Metal recubierto de goma; Acero inoxidable; Madera; Otro
cs: Materiál protahovacího závaží: Hliník; Mosaz; Plast; Kov potažený gumou; Nerezová ocel; Dřevo; Jiné
sk-SK: Materiál preťahovacieho závažia: Hliník; Mosadz; Plast; Pogumovaný kov; Nehrdzavejúca oceľ; Drevo; Iný
da: Trækvægtmateriale: Aluminium; Messing; Plastik; Gummibelagt metal; Rustfrit stål; Træ; Andet
sv: Material för genomdragningsvikt: Aluminium; Mässing; Plast; Gummibelagd metall; Rostfritt stål; Trä; Övrigt
vi: Vật liệu trọng lượng kéo xuyên: Nhôm; Đồng thau; Nhựa; Kim loại bọc cao su; Thép không gỉ; Gỗ; Khác
ko: 풀스루 웨이트 소재: 알루미늄; 황동; 플라스틱; 고무 코팅 금속; 스테인리스 스틸; 목재; 기타
bg-BG: Материал на тежестта за прокарване: Алуминий; Месинг; Пластмаса; Метал с гумено покритие; Неръждаема стомана; Дърво; Друго
pt-BR: Peso passa-pano material: Alumínio; Latão; Plástico; Metal emborrachado; Aço inoxidável; Madeira; Outro
pl: Materiał obciążnika wyciora przeciąganego: Aluminium; Mosiądz; Plastik; Metal powlekany gumą; Stal nierdzewna; Drewno; Inne
ja: 引き抜き重量素材: アルミニウム; 真鍮; プラスチック; ラバーコーティングメタル; ステンレススチール; 木製; その他
hr-HR: Materijal utea za provlačenje: Aluminij; Mjed; Plastika; Metal obložen gumom; Nehrđajući čelik; Drvo; Ostalo
sl-SI: Material obtežitve prehodnega brisala: Aluminij; Medenina; Plastika; Z gumo prevlečena kovina; Nerjavno jeklo; Les; Drugo
zh-TW: 拉繩通條配重材質: 鋁; 黃銅; 塑膠; 橡膠包覆金屬; 不鏽鋼; 木質; 其他
hu: Áthúzósúly anyaga: Alumínium; Sárgaréz; Műanyag; Gumírozott fém; Rozsdamentes acél; Fa; Egyéb
zh-CN: 拉引式通条坠珠材质: 铝; 黄铜; 塑料; 包胶金属; 不锈钢; 木制; 其他
fr: Matériau du poids de guidage: Aluminium; Laiton; Plastique; Métal revêtu de caoutchouc; Acier inoxydable; Bois; Autre
th: วัสดุที่มีน้ำหนักดึงผ่าน: อะลูมิเนียม; ทองเหลือง; พลาสติก; โลหะเคลือบยาง; สเตนเลสสตีล; ไม้; อื่นๆ
ru: Материал утяжелителя для протяжки: Алюминий; Латунь; Пластик; Металл с резиновым покрытием; Нержавеющая сталь; Дерево; Другое
ro-RO: Materialul greutății de tip pull-through: Aluminiu; Alamă; Plastic; Metal acoperit cu cauciuc; Oțel inoxidabil; Lemn; Altele
en: Pull-through weight material: Aluminum; Brass; Plastic; Rubber-coated metal; Stainless steel; Wood; Other
lt-LT: Pertraukiamo svarelio medžiaga: Aliuminis; Žalvaris; Plastikas; Guma dengtas metalas; Nerūdijantysis plienas; Mediena; Kita
tr: Çekme ağırlığı malzemesi: Alüminyum; Pirinç; Plastik; Kauçuk kaplamalı metal; Paslanmaz çelik; Ahşap; Diğer